New York, session 2025-2026, S426.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1-d of the legislative law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision (i) to read as follows: 3 (i) provide an online anti-sexual harassment training course for indi- 4 viduals filing statements of registration as lobbyists pursuant to 5 section one-e of this article, including individuals filing an initial 6 registration statement and individuals filing a renewal registration 7 statement. The curriculum for the course shall be based upon the model 8 sexual harassment prevention guidance document and sexual harassment 9 prevention policy promulgated by the department of labor pursuant to 10 section two hundred one-g of the labor law and shall include, but not be 11 limited to, explanations and discussions of what constitutes sexual 12 harassment, the statutes and regulations of New York concerning sexual 13 harassment, summaries of advisory opinions, underlying purposes and 14 principles of the relevant laws, and examples of practical application 15 of these laws and principles. The curriculum shall include specific 16 material relating to sexual harassment issues in the lobbying and advo- 17 cacy industry. The commission shall prepare those methods and materials 18 necessary to implement the curriculum. The commission shall prepare and 19 publish on its website a list of the names of lobbyists who have failed 20 to complete the training course by the required date and are prohibited 21 from engaging in lobbying activities, provided the commission shall EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01680-01-5 S. 426 2 1 update the list and remove the name of any lobbyist that completes the 2 training course within two business days of the lobbyist's completion of 3 the training course. 4 § 2. Sections 1-u and 1-v of the legislative law, section 1-v as 5 relettered by chapter 1 of the laws of 2005, are relettered sections 1-v 6 and 1-w and a new section 1-u is added to read as follows: 7 § 1-u. Anti-sexual harassment training. Each individual filing a 8 registration statement as a lobbyist pursuant to section one-e of this 9 article, including individuals filing an initial registration statement 10 and individuals filing a renewal registration statement, shall complete 11 the anti-sexual harassment training course provided by the commission 12 pursuant to subdivision (i) of section one-d of this article at least 13 once annually during the period that such individual is registered as a 14 lobbyist. Completion of the training course shall be in addition to, and 15 shall not satisfy, any other statutory or regulatory requirement under 16 state or local law. If any person who has been retained, employed or 17 designated as a lobbyist on or before December fifteenth of the previous 18 calendar year fails to complete such course by December thirty-first of 19 that year, such person shall be prohibited from engaging in lobbying 20 activities in the following year until the person completes the training 21 course. If any person who has been retained, employed or designated as a 22 lobbyist after December fifteenth of the previous calendar year fails to 23 complete such course within thirty days of such retention, employment or 24 designation, such person shall be prohibited from engaging in lobbying 25 activities until the person completes the training course. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to indi- 27 viduals registered as lobbyists on and after January 1, 2027.